Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
This 2026 Act shall be known and may be cited as the 2026 Oregon Veterans’
Services Supplemental Investments Initiative.
DIRECTOR AND DEPUTY DIRECTOR
SECTION 2.  ORS 406.020 is amended to read:
406.020. The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall be under the  supervision and control of the
Director of Veterans’ Affairs. The Governor shall appoint the  director subject to confirmation by
the Senate in the manner provided in ORS 171.562 and 171.565. The appointment may  not be made
without the written approval of the  Advisory Committee provided for in ORS 406.210. The director
shall be a veteran[ ,] who received a  discharge or release under other than dishonorable con-
ditions, chosen on the basis of executive and administrative ability.
SECTION 3. The Director of Veterans’ Affairs, subject to approval by the Governor, may
appoint a deputy director. In appointing a deputy director,  the director shall consider the
experience that a  veteran may bring if a veteran is appointed to the position. The deputy
director serves at the pleasure of the director, has full authority to act for the director  and
is subject to the control of the director.
VETERANS SUICIDE PREVENTION GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section, “veteran” has the meaning  given that term in
ORS 408.225. “Veteran” includes a disabled veteran as defined in ORS 408.225.
(2) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall develop and implement  a grant program
for veteran suicide prevention and workforce training and preparation.  The purpose of the
grant program is to help veterans with  suicide prevention and transition to the workforce
and business community.
Enrolled House Bill 4132 (HB 4132-B) Page 1
(3) Under the grant program, the  department shall award grants through a request for
proposal process to entities involved  in pairing suicide prevention with workforce training
and preparation.
(4) The department shall:
(a) Develop criteria for entities that provide programs for suicide prevention  and
workforce training and preparation;
(b) By rule, establish processes and procedures for  veterans to apply for assistance from
entities that are awarded a grant under the grant program; and
(c) Prioritize awarding grants to entities that provide opportunities for veterans to par-
ticipate in the veterans’ local communities.
(5) The department may solicit and accept gifts, grants and donations  from public and
private sources to further the purposes of this section.
(6) The department may use moneys in the  Veterans’ Services Fund established pursuant
to Article  XV, section 4f, of the Oregon Constitution, to develop, implement and maintain
the grant program.
(7) The department may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 5.
(1) Not later than January 2, 2029, the  Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall
prepare and submit  a report to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related
to veterans on the status of the grant program developed and implemented under section 4
of this 2026 Act.
(2) The department shall  use moneys in the Veterans’ Services Fund established pursu-
ant to Article XV, section 4f, of the  Oregon Constitution, for the initial moneys used to de-
velop, implement and maintain the grant program under section 4 of this 2026 Act.
COUNTY VETERANS’ SERVICE OFFICER PROGRAM
SECTION 6.
 ORS 406.462 is amended to read:
406.462. (1) Moneys appropriated to  the Director of Veterans’ Affairs for the purposes described
in ORS 406.450 must be distributed to county governing bodies and  expended for the purposes of
ORS 406.450 and may not be used to supplant moneys currently budgeted by the director for services
provided by county veterans’ service officers.
(2) The director shall distribute moneys appropriated to the director for the purposes
described in ORS 406.450 on a quarterly basis as follows:
(a) Each fiscal year, the  director shall notify each county governing body of the amount
of moneys to be distributed to the county governing body for the fiscal year.
(b) The county governing body shall provide the director a copy of the county’s budget
for the services to be provided by the county veterans’ service officer for the fiscal year.
(c) At the end of each calendar quarter, the  county governing body shall provide the di-
rector a report on the moneys the county expended during the calendar quarter for the
services provided by the county veterans’ service officer.
(d) Upon receipt of the county governing body’s quarterly report, the director shall dis-
tribute to the county governing body a portion of moneys  allocated to the county governing
body in an amount that is based on  the proportion of all moneys budgeted for all services
provided by county veterans’ service officers that were  expended during the calendar quar-
ter.
(e) At the end of each calendar quarter, the county  governing body may also provide the
director documentation for moneys the  county expended during a previous calendar quarter
in the fiscal year for the services  provided by the county veterans’ service officer that the
county had not previously reported to the director and for which the county governing  body
has not received a distribution of moneys from the director. Upon  receipt of the documen-
tation, the director shall distribute to  the county governing body a portion of moneys allo-
cated to the county governing body in an amount that is based on the proportion of all
Enrolled House Bill 4132 (HB 4132-B) Page 2
moneys budgeted for all services provided by county veterans’ service officers that were  ex-
pended during the calendar quarter within which the county expended  the moneys for which
the county governing body provided the director documentation.
(3) At the  end of each fiscal year, the director shall calculate the remaining moneys not
distributed during the fiscal year and distribute the remaining moneys using a formula es-
tablished under ORS 406.454 to each county governing body that expended 90 percent or more
of the moneys that the  county budgeted for services provided by the county veterans’ service
officer for the fiscal year as specified under subsection (2)(b) of this section. The  director
shall distribute the remaining moneys within 90 days from the last date of the fiscal year.
[(2)] (4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this  section, the director may reduce the amount of
moneys distributed to county governing bodies for county veterans’ service officers if  there is a
decrease in the amount of General Fund or State  Lottery Fund  revenues appropriated to the di-
rector for the purposes described in ORS 406.450 for the same period of time.
SECTION 7. Not later than January 2, 2030, the  Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall
prepare and submit a report to the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related
to veterans and the Association of Oregon Counties on the  distribution of moneys under the
process provided by the amendments to ORS 406.462 by section 6 of this 2026 Act.
COUNTY RECORDS: VETERAN DISCHARGE PAPERS
SECTION 8.  ORS 408.425 is amended to read:
408.425. (1) Each county clerk who receives a  request to inspect veteran discharge papers that
are recorded under ORS 408.420 shall produce the recorded discharge papers for inspection if:
(a) The request for inspection is made in writing;
(b) The request sets forth the name, address and telephone number of the requester;
(c) The  request sets forth the name and the date of birth or the last four digits of the Social
Security number of the veteran; and
(d) The request is made by:
(A) The veteran or [ the spouse, legal guardian ] a person holding a power of attorney for the
veteran or personal representative of the veteran;
(B) A county veterans’ service officer appointed under ORS 408.410;
(C) A representative of the Department of Veterans’ Affairs; or
(D) A  licensed funeral establishment seeking to ascertain if a decedent was a veteran for the
purpose of obtaining veteran’s burial benefits.
(2) This section does not create a cause of action  and may not be asserted as the basis of a per
se negligence claim.
(3) Each county clerk may adopt additional policies in order to protect recorded discharge  pa-
pers from malicious or unlawful use and policies regarding copying of recorded discharge papers.
(4) Each county clerk shall maintain in the records of  the county clerk a copy of each request
for inspection of recorded discharge information for a period of at least 10 years after the date  the
request is received by the county clerk.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 192.390 is amended to read:
192.390. (1) Notwithstanding ORS  192.338, 192.345 and 192.355 and except as otherwise provided
in ORS 192.398, public records that are more than 25 years old shall be available for inspection.
(2) This section does not apply to records that are exempt from  disclosure pursuant to
ORS 192.355 (37) or 408.425.
VETERAN EDUCATIONAL BRIDGE GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 10.  ORS 408.115 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4132 (HB 4132-B) Page 3
408.115. (1) The Veteran  Educational Bridge Grant Program is established within the Depart-
ment of Veterans’ Affairs. Under the program, the  department shall conduct outreach and provide
grants to veterans who:
(a) Are pursuing and enrolled in a course of study that is in or part of:
(A) Any program for which United States Department  of Veterans Affairs education benefits
may be used;
(B) A career school licensed under ORS 345.010 to 345.340;
(C) An apprenticeship program that is registered with the State Apprenticeship and Training
Council; or
(D) An on-the-job training program offered by a public employer;
[(b)(A) Are eligible to receive federal, state or other  financial assistance based on prior service in
the Armed Forces of the United States; or ]
[(B) Demonstrate a need for student financial  aid from any federal or state assistance program,
including Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965; ]
[(c)(A) ] (b)(A) Are unable to complete a degree, apprenticeship or training program within the
expected completion period  because one or more required courses or apprenticeship or training
hours are not available until a later date; [ or]
(B) Have debt on  a student account due to an overpayment of federal or state tuition benefits
or prior course withdrawal that prevents enrollment in a future term; [ and] or
(C) Are experiencing an instance of financial hardship that is interfering  with or could
endanger the ability to remain enrolled in a degree, apprenticeship or training  program; and
[(d)] (c) Are making satisfactory academic or training progress [ or progress ] in a program de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) Grants under the program:
(a) May not exceed [ $5,000] $10,000 per veteran; and
(b) May be made only when  there are sufficient moneys in the Veteran Educational Bridge
Grant Program Fund established under ORS 408.125 to make the grants.
(3) The Department  of Veterans’ Affairs shall adopt rules for the implementation and operation
of the program, including eligibility requirements for grant applicants.
(4) As used in this section, “veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS  408.225 and in-
cludes disabled veterans, as defined in ORS 408.225.
VETERANS’ TREATMENT COURT
SECTION 11.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Service member” means a person who is a member of the Armed  Forces of the
United States, the reserve components  of the Armed Forces of the United States or the
National Guard.
(b) “Veteran” means a person who:
(A) Served as a member of the  Armed Forces of the United States, the reserve compo-
nents of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard; and
(B) Received an honorable discharge, a general discharge under honorable conditions  or
a discharge under other than honorable conditions.
(c) “Veterans’ treatment court” means a treatment drug court program, as  defined in
ORS 3.450, that serves service members and veterans.
(2) The Judicial Department, in consultation with the Oregon Criminal Justice  Commis-
sion, shall study methods for providing access to veterans’ treatment courts  to the residents
of each county or judicial district. The study must include the identification and recommen-
dation of innovative, cost-efficient and data-driven  means to extend the availability of
veterans’ treatment courts that are consistent with  applicable standards developed under
ORS 137.680. The commission shall assist the department in conducting the study.
Enrolled House Bill 4132 (HB 4132-B) Page 4
(3) In conducting the study and developing recommendations, the department and the
commission may consult with stakeholders and entities that engage with veterans’ treatment
courts.
(4) The department  shall submit a report on its findings in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of  the
Legislative Assembly related to the military and veterans no later than November 1, 2026.
SECTION 12.
Section 11 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
EXPENDITURE LIMITATIONS
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 526, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Veterans’ Services  Fund established under ORS 406.140 to the Department
of Veterans’ Affairs, for strategic partnership, is  increased by $353,115, for the purposes of
a grant program for veteran suicide prevention and workforce training and preparation  un-
der section 4 of this 2026 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 14. The unit captions  used in this 2026 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 15. This 2026 Act takes effect on July 1, 2026.
Passed by House March 3, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 6, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4132 (HB 4132-B) Page 5